test/src/morphology/V-siltteed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - siltteed: # Verb 'to know how / osata' - full paradigm
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silttääm
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: silttääk
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: silttad
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: siltteep
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: silttveˊted
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: silttee 
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prs+4: siltteet
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: siltteem
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: silttiiǩ
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: silttii
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [silttiim, silttiin]
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: silttiid
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: silttee
     siltteed+V+Ind+Prt+4: siltteeš
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg1: siltteˊžem
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg2: siltteˊžiǩ
     siltteed+V+Pot+Sg3: siltteež
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl1: [siltteˊžep, siltteˊžim]
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl2: siltteˊžid 
     siltteed+V+Pot+Pl3: siltteˊže
     siltteed+V+Pot+4: siltteˊžet
     siltteed+V+Pot+ConNeg: siltteˊže
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg1: siltteˊčem
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg2: siltteˊčiǩ
     siltteed+V+Cond+Sg3: siltteˊči
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl1: [siltteˊčim, siltteˊčep]
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl2: siltteˊčid
     siltteed+V+Cond+Pl3: siltteˊče
     siltteed+V+Cond+4: siltteˊčeš
     siltteed+V+Cond+ConNeg: siltteˊče
     siltteed+V+Imp+Sg2: silttâd
     siltteed+V+Imp+Sg3: silttââǥǥas
     siltteed+V+Imp+Pl1: silttâkap
     siltteed+V+Imp+Pl2: siltteˊǩed
     siltteed+V+Imp+Pl3: silttâkaz
     siltteed+V+Imp+ConNeg: silttukku
     siltteed+V+ActEss: siltteˊmen
     siltteed+V+Action: siltteem
     siltteed+V+PrsPrc: siltteei
     siltteed+V+PrfPrc: silttääm
     siltteed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [silttummu, silttuum]
     siltteed+V+VAbess: siltteǩâni
     siltteed+V+GerTemp: siltteen
     siltteed+V+GerInstr: siltteeˊl
